Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Article 2. State Institutions

§ 25-1-201.
Establishment of state institutions.

The following state institutions are established:

The Wyoming state penitentiary at Rawlins, Wyoming;

The Wyoming boys’ school at Worland, Wyoming;

The Wyoming girls’ school at Sheridan, Wyoming;

The Wyoming life resource center at Lander, Wyoming;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 7, § 2.

The Wyoming pioneer home at Thermopolis, Wyoming;

The veterans’ home of Wyoming at Buffalo, Wyoming;

The Wyoming retirement center at Basin, Wyoming;

The Wyoming women’s center at Lusk, Wyoming;

The Wyoming state hospital at Evanston, Wyoming;

The Wyoming medium correctional institution at Torrington, Wyoming;

The Wyoming school for the deaf at Casper, Wyoming;

The Wyoming honor farm at Riverton, Wyoming;

The Wyoming honor conservation camp at Newcastle, Wyoming;

The Wyoming veterans’ skilled nursing facility at Buffalo, Wyoming.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 25, § 4.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 185, § 2.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 52, § 26; R.S. 1887, § 3764; Laws 1899, ch. 17, §§ 1, 4; R.S. 1899, §§ 648, 690, 693; Laws 1903, ch. 46, § 1; C.S. 1910, §§ 449, 579, 583; Laws 1911, ch. 78, § 1; ch. 107, § 1; 1913, ch. 63, § 4; 1915, ch. 140, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 511, 619, 622, 668, 672; Laws 1921, ch. 40, § 1; 1925, ch. 156, §§ 1, 3, 4; 1929, ch. 101, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 56-102, 108-901, 108-906, 108-1001, 108-1003, 108-1004, 108-1301, 108-1305; Laws 1945, ch. 9, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 19-301, 19-305, 19-1301, 19-1304, 19-1401, 19-1404, 19-1405, 51-102; Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, § 1; 1951, ch. 80, § 1; 1955, ch. 26, § 1; 1957, ch. 19, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-397, 9-400, 9-412, 9-414, 9-415, 9-479, 9-484, 9-488, 25-34; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-6-301, 9-6-304, 9-6-402, 9-6-404, 9-6-405, 9-6-901, 9-6-1001, 9-6-1008,

25-2-102

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 11, § 1; ch. 181, § 1; 1986, ch. 65, § 1; 1987, ch. 185, § 2; 1989, ch. 40, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 3; ch. 245, § 2; 1992, ch. 25, § 4; 1993, ch. 185, § 2; 1998, ch. 7, § 2; 2005, ch. 93, § 1; 2008, ch. 85, § 1; 2019 ch. 156, § 2, effective February 28, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to the appointment and removal of officers and the duties of those officers, see § 25-1-104(d)(iv), (e).

As to sections for juvenile offenders, see §§

14-6-245

through

14-6-252

.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 156 § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(xi), substituted “medium correctional institution at Torrington” for “correctional facility at Lovell”; and added (a)(xiii) and (a)(xiv).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “life resource center” for “state training school” in (a)(iv).

The 2019 amendment,

added (a)(xv).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 2, subsection 48, effective July 1, 2004, authorizes the department to deposit all monies and income received and collected by the Wyoming state hospital at Evanston, Wyoming into a special revenue fund from July 1, 2004 through June 30, 2006. The department is to expend this revenue to correct life safety code problems and address other conditions as identified by the Partnership to Resolve Mental Health Issues in Wyoming. If any single project is anticipated to or does exceed $200,000, it must be approved by the state building commission. The first $500,000 received each fiscal year by the department and any amount in excess of $3,000,000 received over the period beginning July 1, 2004 and ending June 30, 2006 and deposited within the special revenue fund pursuant to this section is to be paid to the omnibus permanent land fund until such time as the total amount appropriated for the new facility at the state hospital in 1999 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 169, Section 3, Section 048 is completely repaid. The department must report a detail of expenditures to the joint appropriations interim committee by October 31 of each year.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 2, subsection 048, authorizes the department to deposit all monies and income received and collected by the Wyoming state hospital at Evanston, Wyoming into a special revenue fund from July 1, 2004 through June 30, 2006, to be expended to correct life safety code problems and address other conditions as identified by the Partnership to Resolve Mental Health Issues in Wyoming.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided in art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Employee of independent contractor. —

District court improperly denied a government hospital's motion for partial summary judgment in a medical malpractice action arising from the actions of a nurse employed by a contracted anesthesia services provider because the nurse was not a “public employee” for purposes of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, and the Act did not provide an express waiver of sovereign immunity for non-employees of a governmental hospital; the district court erred in reading a prior appellate decision as implicitly waiving sovereign immunity against governmental entities for acts of ostensible or apparent agents. Campbell County Mem. Hosp. v. Pfeifle, 2014 WY 3, 317 P.3d 573,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2014).

State hospital is state agency. —

The Wyoming state hospital is an agency of the state created by statute at the mandate of the state constitution. Carbon County Sch. Dist. v. Wyoming State Hosp., 680 P.2d 773,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1984).

Superintendent, formerly staff psychologist, terminated without hearing. —

The petitioner, who had been a staff psychologist at the Wyoming state hospital, did not retain his permanent employee status when he accepted an appointment to serve as the superintendent of the hospital, and because he served as superintendent at the will of the board, he was not entitled to a hearing before the board terminated his employment. Doidge v. Board of Charities & Reform, 789 P.2d 880,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1990).